Georgia, session 2025_26, HB856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act relating to the Brooks County Development Authority, approved March 9, 1967 (Ga.
L. 1967, p. 2097), is amended by repealing and reserving Section 2.
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 3 as follows:
"SECTION 3.
The governing authority of Brooks County shall appoint seven members to the authority
by selecting outstanding citizens of Brooks County. Two members shall be residents of
Brooks County residing within the corporate limits of the City of Quitman, and the
H. B. 856
- 1 -

LC 47 3611/AP
remaining five members shall be residents residing anywhere within the geographic
boundaries of Brooks County. Members shall serve terms of office of four years and until
their successors are duly appointed and qualified."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 856
- 2 -